Maryland, session 2025, HB0684.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Natural Resources
8–205.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from existing law.
Underlining indicates amendments to bill.
Strike out indicates matter stricken from the bill by amendment or deleted from the law by
amendment. *hb0684*

HOUSE BILL 684
(a) In this section, “Fund” means the State Lakes Protection and Restoration
Fund.
(b) There is a State Lakes Protection and Restoration Fund.
(c) The purpose of the Fund is to protect and restore [State–owned or
State–managed lakes] DEEP CREEK LAKE by:
(1) Removing sediment;
(2) Treating contaminated sediment;
(3) Preventing the spread of invasive species;
(4) Improving ecological and recreational value; and
(5) Taking any other action the Department determines is necessary.
(d) The Secretary shall administer the Fund.
(e) (1) The Fund is a special, nonlapsing fund that is not subject to § 7–302 of
the State Finance and Procurement Article.
(2) The State Treasurer shall hold the Fund separately, and the
Comptroller shall account for the Fund.
(f) The Fund consists of:
(1) Money appropriated in the State budget to the Fund; and
(2) Any other money from any other source accepted for the benefit of the
Fund.
(g) The Fund may be used only for the protection or restoration of [State–owned
or State–managed lakes] DEEP CREEK LAKE by:
(1) Removing sediment;
(2) Treating contaminated sediment;
(3) Preventing the spread of invasive species;
(4) Improving ecological and recreational value; and
(5) Taking any other action the Department determines is necessary.

HOUSE BILL 684 3
(h) (1) The State Treasurer shall invest the money of the Fund in the same
manner as other State money may be invested.
(2) Any interest earnings of the Fund shall be credited to the Fund.
(i) Expenditures from the Fund may be made only in accordance with the State
budget.
(j) Money expended from the Fund for the protection or restoration of
[State–owned or State–managed lakes] DEEP CREEK LAKE is supplemental to and is not
intended to take the place of funding that would otherwise be appropriated for the
protection or restoration of [State–owned or State–managed lakes] DEEP CREEK LAKE.
(k) For fiscal year YEARS [2020 and each fiscal year thereafter] 2027 AND 2028,
the Governor shall include in the annual budget bill an appropriation of $1,000,000
$500,000 to the Fund.
Chapter 698 of the Acts of 2018, as amended by Chapter 39 of the Acts of 2022
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2018. It shall remain effective for a period of [7] 9 10 years and, at the end of June 30,
[2025] 2027 2028, this Act, with no further action required by the General Assembly, shall
be abrogated and of no further force and effect.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect June
1, 2025.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.